Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-382
Residential facilities; admission; department; jurisdiction.

Except as provided in sections 79-1148 and 79-1149, the department shall have jurisdiction of the admission of persons with mental retardation to a residential facility. Applications for admission to a residential facility shall be filed with the department.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 2, p. 3064;

Laws 1981, LB 499, § 42;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 48;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 74;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1067;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 953;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 799.